Hawaii statutes.
§36-8 Director may administer oaths.
The director of finance may administer all necessary oaths connected with the
duties of the director's department. [CC 1859, §475; RL 1925, §1249; RL 1935,
§2208; RL 1945, §5809; RL 1955, §132-9; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c
114, §1; HRS §36-8; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 13 H. 85.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next